Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-211
Commercial aquaculturist, defined.

Commercial aquaculturist means an aquaculturist engaged in the business of growing, selling, brokering, or processing live or viable aquatic organisms for commercial purposes.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 21.